Nevada, session 83, AB66.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. NRS 3.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.011 For the First Judicial District there must be [two] three
district judges.
-
*AB66_R1*

– 2 –
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. NRS 3.0195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.0195 For the Tenth Judicial District there must be [one] two
district [judge.] judges.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. Each additional district judge required pursuant to the
amendatory provisions of sections 2 and 8 of this act must be
selected at the general election to be held on November 3, 2026, and
take office on January 4, 2027, for a term that expires on January 3,
2033.
Sec. 11. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 12. 1. This section and sections 1, 10 and 11 of this act
become effective on January 1, 2026.
2. Sections 2 and 8 of this act become effective on January 4,
2027.
H
-
*AB66_R1*